California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) Prior to accessing confidential HIV-related public health records, Franchise Tax Board staff and contractors shall be required to annually sign a confidentiality agreement developed by the State Department of Public Health that includes information related to the penalties under Section 121025 of the Health and Safety Code for a breach of confidentiality
 and the procedures for reporting a breach of confidentiality under subdivision (j) of Section 121022 of the Health and Safety Code. Those agreements shall be reviewed annually by the State Department of Public Health.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall return or destroy all information received from the State Department of Public Health after completing the exchange of information.

(d) For purposes of this section, “foreign earned income” also includes any deduction taken for the housing expenses of an individual while living abroad pursuant to Section 911 of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) For purposes of this section, “household” means the applicant or recipient, and, in addition, the applicant’s or recipient’s spouse or registered domestic partner, and all other individuals for whom the applicant or recipient, or the applicant’s or recipient’s spouse or registered domestic partner, is allowed a federal income tax deduction for the taxable year.

(f) For purposes of this section, “family size” has the meaning given to that term in Section 36B(d)(1) of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code, and includes same or opposite sex married couples, registered domestic partners, and any dependent, as defined by Section 152 of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code, of either spouse or registered domestic partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 766, Sec. 4.   (SB 504)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Scholarshare Investment Board shall disclose the name and individual taxpayer identification number (ITIN) or social security number of a participant in a qualified tuition program established pursuant to Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code to the Franchise Tax Board for the purpose of verifying the income eligibility for participants of any of
 the programs administered by the Scholarshare Investment Board.

(b) (1) The Franchise Tax Board, upon receipt of this information, shall inform the Scholarshare Investment Board of both of the following:

(A) The amounts of the federal adjusted gross income as reported by the taxpayer to the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) The amounts of the California adjusted gross income as reported by the taxpayer to the Franchise Tax Board or as adjusted by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the information to the Scholarshare Investment Board for the most recent taxable year that the Franchise Tax Board has information available, and shall include the first and last name, date of birth, and the ITIN or social security
 number of the taxpayer.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall return or destroy all information received from the Scholarshare Investment Board after completing the exchange of information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 250, Sec. 20.   (AB 129)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.4.

The Franchise Tax Board shall annually furnish the jury commissioner of each county with a list of resident state tax filers, as defined in Section 197 of the Code of Civil Procedure, for the purpose of expanding jury pools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 230, Sec. 3.   (SB 592)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.5.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may, upon request, disclose to the California Health Benefit Exchange, the State Department of Health Care Services, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and county departments and agencies, returns or return information described in paragraph (2) in the records of the Franchise Tax Board, through information sharing agreements or data interfaces, to verify or determine eligibility of an individual for
 Medi-Cal benefits, the Healthy Families Program, the Access for Infants and Mothers Program, health benefits, tax credits, health insurance subsidies, or cost-sharing reductions through the Exchange.

(2) The returns and return information that may be disclosed pursuant to this section is limited to the following:

(A) Information necessary to validate or make the eligibility determination, including wages, withholdings, identifying information, and credits.

(B) The demographic information of any taxpayer.

(C) Tax refund information of any taxpayer.

(3) In addition to the penalties under this article for unauthorized use or disclosure of the information disclosed pursuant to this section by
 any deputy, agent, clerk, officer, or employee of any agency receiving information pursuant to this section, any information received from the Franchise Tax Board as a result of this section shall be subject to the information sharing and confidentiality requirements in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 100504 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) This section shall not be construed to supersede the requirements and protections in the California Right to Financial Privacy Act under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code in obtaining information in possession of any financial institution.

(2) This section shall not be construed to supersede or replace or in any way modify any privacy and information security requirements and protections in federal and state law regarding protected health information or
 personally identifiable information, including, but not limited to, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), Section 14100.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and any other state or federal laws that are intended to, or have the effect of, protecting individual privacy and information security in any circumstance. 

(c) The Franchise Tax Board may require reimbursement for costs incurred in providing information specified in this Section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 815, Sec. 2.   (AB 174)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.8.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall disclose to the California Health Benefit Exchange individual income tax return information described in paragraph (2) and other information related to the income tax return in the records of the Franchise Tax Board, through information sharing agreements or data interfaces, for purposes of providing the notification required under Section 100720 of the Government Code.

(2) Individual income tax return information that may be disclosed to the California Health Benefit Exchange pursuant to this section is limited to the following information from the individual income tax return of a taxpayer who fails to report minimum essential coverage, as required by Section 100705 of the Government Code, or fails to reconcile the advanced premium assistance subsidy, as required by Section 100810 of the Government Code:

(A) Taxpayer name or, in the case of taxpayers filing a joint return, the names of both spouses or domestic partners.

(B) Full mailing address listed on the return.

(C) Number and age of household dependents.

(D) Gross income.

(E) Number of months the applicable individual, as defined in Section 61000, and the applicable individual’s applicable spouse and applicable dependents, if any, as defined in Section 61000, were covered by minimum essential coverage.

(F) The amount of the penalty paid or owed by a taxpayer.

(G) Whether the taxpayer or any of the taxpayer’s dependents claimed an exemption from the Minimum Essential Coverage Individual Mandate established pursuant to Title 24 (commencing with Section 100700) of the Government Code and the Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty assessed pursuant to Part 32 (commencing with Section 61000), and which exemption or exemptions were claimed.

(H) Whether the taxpayer reconciled the premium assistance subsidy advanced pursuant to
 Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code with the premium assistance subsidy granted.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may require reimbursement from the California Health Benefit Exchange for costs incurred in providing the information specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 41.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.9.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board, upon receiving authorization and the information from the taxpayer pursuant to Section 18543, shall disclose to the California Health Benefit Exchange the individual income tax return information described in paragraph (2), through information sharing agreements or data interfaces, for purposes of providing notification under subdivision (b) of Section 100720 of the Government Code.

(2) Individual income tax return information that may be disclosed to the California Health Benefit Exchange pursuant to this section is limited to the following information from the individual income tax return of a taxpayer that
 provides the authorization described in Section 18543:

(A) Taxpayer name, or in the case of taxpayers filing a joint return, the names of both spouses or domestic partners.

(B) Full mailing address listed on the return.

(C) Number and age of household dependents.

(D) Gross income.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may require reimbursement from the California Health Benefit Exchange for costs incurred in providing the information specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 170, Sec. 3.   (SB 967)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Return” means any tax or information return, or claim for refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part which is filed with the Franchise Tax Board by, on behalf of, or with respect to any person, estate, or trust, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists which
 are supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed.

(b) “Return information” means a taxpayer’s identity, the nature, source, or amount of his, her, or its income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax withheld, deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether the taxpayer’s return was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or processing, or any other data, received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the Franchise Tax Board with respect to a return or with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of any person under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part for any tax, addition to tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition, or offense.

(c) “Taxpayer return information” means return information as defined in subdivision (b) which is filed with, or furnished to, the Franchise Tax Board by or on behalf of the taxpayer to whom the return information relates.

(d) “Tax administration” means the administration, management, conduct, direction, and supervision of the execution and application of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19550.

(a) Pursuant to Section 817.5 of the Penal Code, the Franchise Tax Board, upon request from the Department of Justice, a court, or any California law enforcement agency and in a form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, shall provide to the Department of Justice, the court, or the law enforcement agency the address of any person represented to be a person for whom there is an outstanding arrest warrant.

(b) (1) Pursuant to Section 290.9 of
 the Penal Code, the Franchise Tax Board shall, upon request from the Department of Justice, provide to the Department of Justice the address of any person represented to be a person who is in violation of his or her duty to register under Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(2) This subdivision shall be operative with respect to requests made on or after January 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 290.9 of the Penal Code, as added by Section 1 of Chapter 127 of the Statutes of 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 349, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may permit the Commissioner of Internal Revenue of the United States, other tax officials of this state, the Multistate Tax Commission, the proper officer of any state imposing an income tax or a tax measured by income or the authorized representative of that officer, or the tax officials of Mexico, if a reciprocal agreement exists, to inspect the income tax returns of any taxpayer, or may
 furnish to the commission, or the officer or the authorized representative thereof an abstract of the return or supply thereto information concerning any item of income contained in any return or disclosed by the report of any investigation of the income or return. The information shall be furnished to the Multistate Tax Commission, the federal or state officer or his or her representative, or the officials of Mexico for tax purposes only. Except when furnished pursuant to a written agreement, information furnished pursuant to this section shall be furnished only if the request is in the form of an affidavit under penalty of perjury stating that the purpose for the request relates to an investigation of the tax specified in the request and that the information will be used in the ordinary performance of the applicant’s official duties.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and except as otherwise provided in 19551.1, tax officials of political
 subdivisions of this state shall request information from the Franchise Tax Board by affidavit only. At the time a tax official makes the request, he or she shall provide the affected person with a copy of the affidavit and, upon request, make the information obtained available to that person.

(c) For purposes of this section, “reciprocal agreement” means a formal agreement to exchange information between national taxing officials of Mexico and taxing authorities of the State Board of Equalization, the Franchise Tax Board, and the Employment Development Department. Furthermore, the reciprocal agreement shall be limited to the exchange of information that is essential for tax administration purposes only. Taxing authorities of the State of California shall be granted tax information only on California residents. Taxing authorities of Mexico shall be granted tax information only on Mexican nationals.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 513, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 52, Sec. 6.   (SB 855)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.1.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may permit the tax officials of any city, county, or city and county to enter into a reciprocal agreement with the Franchise Tax Board to obtain tax information from the Franchise Tax Board, as specified in subdivision (b).

(2) For purposes of this section, “reciprocal agreement” means a formal
 agreement to exchange information for tax administration purposes between tax officials of a city, county, or city and county, and the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) The information furnished to tax officials of a city, county, or city and county under this section shall be limited as follows:

(1) The tax officials of a city, county, or city and county are authorized to receive information only with respect to taxpayers with an address as reflected on the Franchise Tax Board’s records within the jurisdictional boundaries of the city, county, or city and county who report income from a trade or business to the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) The tax information that may be provided by the Franchise Tax Board to a city, county, or city and county is limited to a taxpayer’s name, address, social security or taxpayer identification
 number, and business activity code.

(3) Tax information provided to the taxing authority of a city, county, or city and county shall not be furnished to, or used by, any person other than an employee of that taxing authority and shall be utilized in a form and manner to safeguard the tax information as required by the Franchise Tax Board, including, but not limited to:

(A) The completion of a data exchange security questionnaire provided by the Franchise Tax Board prior to approval of a data exchange by the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) The tax official of a city, county, or city and county shall allow for an onsite safeguard review conducted by the Franchise Tax Board.

(C) The completion of disclosure training provided by the Franchise Tax Board and a
 confidentiality statement signed by all employees with access to information provided by the Franchise Tax Board confirming the requirement of data security with respect to that information and acknowledging awareness of penalties for unauthorized access or disclosure under Sections 19542 and 19552 of this code and Section 502 of the Penal Code.

(D) The tax official of a city, county, or city and county shall notify the Franchise Tax Board within 24 hours upon discovery of any incident of unauthorized or suspected unauthorized access or disclosure of the tax information and provide a detailed report of the incident and the parties involved.

(E) All records received by the tax officials of a city, county, or city and county shall be destroyed in a manner to make them unusable or unreadable so an individual record may no longer be ascertained in a timeframe specified by the
 Franchise Tax Board.

(4) The information provided to the tax officials of the city, county, or city and county by the Franchise Tax Board under this section is subject to Section 19542, and may not be used for any purpose other than the city, county, or city and county’s tax enforcement, or as otherwise authorized by state or federal law.

(5) Section 19542.1 applies to this section.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board may not provide any information pursuant to this section until all of the following have occurred:

(1) An agreement has been executed between a city, county, or city and county and the Franchise Tax Board, that provides that an amount equal to all first year costs necessary to furnish the city, county, or city and county information pursuant to
 this section shall be received by the Franchise Tax Board before the Franchise Tax Board incurs any costs associated with the activity permitted by this section. For purposes of this section, first year costs include costs associated with, but not limited to, the purchasing of equipment, the development of processes, and labor.

(2) An agreement has been executed between a city, county, or city and county and the Franchise Tax Board, that provides that the annual costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board, as a result of the activity permitted by this section, shall be reimbursed by the city, county, or city and county to the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) Pursuant to the agreement described in paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board has received an amount equal to the first year costs.

(d) Any information, other than the
 type of tax information specified in subdivision (b), may be requested by the tax officials of a city, county, or city and county from the Franchise Tax Board by affidavit. At the time a tax official makes the request, he or she shall provide the person whose information is the subject of the request, with a copy of the affidavit and, upon request, make the information obtained available to that person.

(e) This section does not invalidate any other law. This section does not preclude any city, county, or city and county from obtaining information about individual taxpayers, including those taxpayers not subject to this section, by any other means permitted by state or federal law.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any obligations, rights, or remedies regarding personal information provided under state or federal law.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the Franchise Tax Board shall waive a city, county, or city and county’s reimbursement of the Franchise Tax Board’s cost if a city, county, or city and county enters into a reciprocal agreement as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The reciprocal agreement shall specify that each party shall bear its own costs to furnish the data involved in the exchange authorized by this section and Section 19551.5, and a city, county, or city and county shall be precluded from obtaining reimbursement as specified under Section 5 of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 52, Sec. 7.   (SB 855)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board shall, upon request, when necessary for Employment Development Department (EDD) unemployment program administration, disclose to the EDD return or return information described in subdivision (b) in the records of the Franchise Tax Board, through information sharing agreements or data interfaces. These EDD unemployment programs include, but are not limited to, the federal Pandemic Unemployment Assistance program, Section 2102 of the federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 9021), and any extension of this program, and the federal Disaster Unemployment Assistance program, Section 410 of the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5177).

(b) The return and return information authorized to be disclosed pursuant to this section are limited to information necessary to verify income, which may include, but not be limited to, earnings, identifying information, net profit and loss, self-employment, or other information needed for administration of the unemployment programs administered by the EDD.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 264, Sec. 25.   (AB 107)   Effective September 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.3.

(a) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall exchange data with the Franchise Tax Board upon request, including the name, date of birth, address, household or case identification number, and the individual taxpayer identification number or social security number of a program participant. The data provided shall remain confidential and shall be used only for purposes of informing individuals of the availability of the Volunteer Income Tax Assistance (VITA), CalFile, the federal Earned Income Tax Credit, the California Earned Income Tax Credit, and other federal and state antipoverty tax credits that are designed to alleviate poverty and tax burdens of low-income households, and for providing an estimate of potential state antipoverty tax credits to individuals.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 19542 or any other law, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2026, the Franchise Tax Board may, upon request, disclose the return information described in paragraph (1) to the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(1) Upon receipt of the information described in subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board may disclose the following:

(A) Whether the program participant did not file a tax return.

(B) Whether the program participant was claimed as a dependent on a tax return.

(2) The information provided shall remain confidential and shall be used only for purposes of informing
 individuals of the availability of the Volunteer Income Tax Assistance (VITA), CalFile, the federal Earned Income Tax Credit, the California Earned Income Tax Credit, and other federal and state antipoverty tax credits that are designed to alleviate poverty and tax burdens of low-income households.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall not disclose or provide any federal tax information.

(c) (1) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services that receive data from the Franchise Tax Board shall annually provide to the Franchise Tax Board, no later than January 1 of each calendar year, the results and findings of outreach conducted to measure whether the outreach achieves its intended purpose of increasing the number of claims for the federal Earned Income Tax Credit, the California Earned Income Tax Credit, and other state
 and federal antipoverty tax credits.

(2) The results and findings of outreach conducted by the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services required under paragraph (1) shall include, but are not limited to, the following information:

(A) The number of outreach contacts.

(B) A description of each outreach program and the parameters of that program.

(C) The number of individuals responding to outreach contacts referenced in subparagraph (A), if known.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply:

(1) “Voluntary Income Tax Assistance (VITA)” means the free basic income tax
 return preparation program, for federal and state personal income tax returns, managed by the Internal Revenue Service and operated by Internal Revenue Service partners and trained volunteers.

(2) “CalFile” means the Franchise Tax Board’s free, direct, online program for taxpayers to complete and e-file their state personal income tax returns.

(3) “Program participant” means any individual who receives benefits from a social services program administered by the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Care Services.

(e) An unauthorized disclosure or use of the information disclosed pursuant to this section is a misdemeanor pursuant to Section 19552.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 7.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board may disclose to the State Department of Social Services return or return information described in subdivision (b) through information sharing agreements or data interfaces.

(b) The return and return information authorized to be disclosed pursuant to this section is limited to information necessary to verify eligibility, including, but not limited to, earnings, identifying information, or other information needed for administration of the foster youth tax credit under Section 17052.2.

(c) (1) The information provided to the State Department of Social Services under this section is subject to Section
 19542.

(2) The State Department of Social Services and any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent, of the State Department of Social Services shall not disclose or use any information obtained from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section except for the purpose of administration of the foster youth tax credit under Section 17052.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 72, Sec. 4.   (SB 201)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, each city, county, or city and county that assesses a city, county, or city and county business tax or requires a city, county, or city and county business license shall, upon the request of the Franchise Tax Board, annually submit to the Franchise Tax Board the information that is collected in the course of administration of the city, county, or city and county’s business tax or
 business license program, as described in subdivision (b).

(b) Information, collected in the course of administration of the city, county, or city and county’s business tax or business license program, shall be limited to the following:

(1) Name of the business, if the business is a corporation, partnership, or limited liability company, or the owner’s name if the business is a sole proprietorship.

(2) Business mailing address.

(3) Federal employer identification number, if applicable, or the business owner’s social security number, if known.

(4) Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) Code or North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) Code.

(5) Business start date.

(6) Business cease date.

(7) City, county, or city and county account or license number.

(8) Ownership type.

(c) The reports required under this section shall be filed on magnetic media such as tapes or compact discs, through a secure electronic process, or in other machine-readable form, according to standards prescribed by regulations promulgated by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) Cities that receive a request from the Franchise Tax Board shall begin providing to the Franchise Tax Board the information required by this section as soon as economically feasible, but no later than December 31, 2009. The
 information shall be furnished annually at a time and in the form that the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe by regulation.

(e) The city, county, or city and county data provided to the Franchise Tax Board under this section is subject to Section 19542, and may not be used for any purpose other than state tax enforcement or as otherwise authorized by law.

(f) If a city, county, or city and county enters into a reciprocal agreement with the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19551.1, the city, county, or city and county shall also waive reimbursement for costs incurred to provide information required under this section and shall be precluded from obtaining reimbursement as specified under Section 5 of Chapter 345 of the Statutes of 2008. The reciprocal agreement shall specify that each party shall bear its own costs to furnish the data involved in the
 exchange authorized by Section 19551.1 and this section, and the Franchise Tax Board shall be precluded from obtaining reimbursement as specified under subdivision (c) of Section 19551.1.

(g) A city, county, or city and county shall not be required to provide information to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section if the Franchise Tax Board fails to provide tax information to the city, county, or city and county pursuant to a reciprocal agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19551.1 for reasons other than concerns related to confidentiality of tax information provided to the city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 52, Sec. 8.   (SB 855)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.6.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Treasurer shall disclose to the Franchise Tax Board, through information-sharing agreements or data interfaces, information described in paragraph (2) for the sole purpose of determining eligibility under the California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Act (Chapter 16.1 (commencing with Section 18997.5) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(2) The information authorized to be disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1) is limited to information necessary to verify eligibility, including, but not limited to, name, individual taxpayer identification
 number (ITIN) or social security number, date of birth, and other information needed under the California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Act (Chapter 16.1 (commencing with Section 18997.5) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) to verify the income of individuals.

(b) (1) The Franchise Tax Board, after receipt of the information described in subdivision (a), shall disclose to the Treasurer, through information-sharing agreements or data interfaces, the amounts of the federal adjusted gross income as reported by the taxpayer to the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall only provide the information described in paragraph (1) if available in the records of the Franchise
 Tax Board and with respect to taxpayers for whom the Treasurer provided the information under subdivision (a).

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the information described in paragraph (1) to the Treasurer for the most recent and preceding taxable year that the Franchise Tax Board has information available.

(4) The Franchise Tax Board shall not disclose or provide any federal tax information.

(c) (1) The information provided to the Treasurer under this section is subject to Section 19542.

(2) The Treasurer, or any current or former officer, employee, or agent of the Treasurer, shall not disclose or use any information obtained from
 the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section except for the purpose described in subdivision (a).

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall return or destroy all information received from the Treasurer after completing the exchange of information under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1010, Sec. 4.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19552.

Except as otherwise provided by this article, the information furnished or secured pursuant to either this article or the express provisions of law, shall be used solely for the purpose of administering the tax laws or other laws administered by the person or agency obtaining it. Any unwarranted disclosure or use of the information by the person or agency, or the employees and officers thereof, is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19553.

(a) Subject to the limitations of subdivision (b) of this section and federal law, the Franchise Tax Board may permit the Director of Social Services or deputy directors to inspect the income tax returns of applicants for aid, recipients of aid, or responsible relatives, or in lieu of the inspection, the State Franchise Tax Board may provide the director or deputy directors an abstract of the income tax return requested, or supply information concerning any item of income contained in the return or disclosed by
 the report of any investigation of the income or return of the applicant for aid, recipient of aid or responsible relative.

(b) The right of the director or deputy directors to inspect income tax records or obtain the other information as provided in this section shall be limited to the records for the current year and the year preceding inspection of applicants or recipients of assistance under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the responsible relatives of the applicants or recipients. The information obtained pursuant to this section shall be used or disclosed only for the purpose of enabling the Director of Social Services or his or her deputy directors to verify or determine the eligibility or entitlement of an applicant for, or recipient of, public social services or the obligation of a responsible relative.

(c) The counties
 are authorized to request the information as provided in this section from the Director of Social Services or deputy directors. The director may release the information to the director of a county from which the applicant or recipient receives aid and the information shall be used or disclosed by the director of the county only for the purpose specified in subdivision (b).

(d) The applicant or recipient or responsible relative whose income tax records have been requested of the Franchise Tax Board shall be notified by mail that the request has been made at the time of the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19554.

(a) Subject to the limitations of this section and federal law, the Franchise Tax Board may provide the Controller with the address or other identification or location information from income tax returns or other records which is necessary for the Controller to locate owners of unclaimed property pursuant to Title 10 (commencing with Section 1300) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Subject to the limitations of this section and Section 6103(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, the Franchise Tax Board may provide the Controller, on an annual basis, with the following information from business entity income tax returns or other business entity records maintained by the Franchise Tax Board:

(1) The taxpayer’s name.

(2) The taxpayer’s identification number.

(3) The taxpayer’s address.

(4) The taxpayer’s principal business activity code.

(5) The taxpayer’s entity status and the date that the Franchise Tax Board last updated the taxpayer’s entity status.

(6) The taxpayer’s revenue range.

(7) Whether the taxpayer previously filed an unclaimed property report with the Controller, and, if applicable, both of the following:

(A) The date filed of the taxpayer’s last report.

(B) The amount remitted on the taxpayer’s last report.

(c) (1) The information provided to the Controller under this section is subject to Section 19542.

(2) Neither the Controller nor any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent of the Controller may disclose or use any information obtained from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section except for the purpose of locating owners of unclaimed property as provided in subdivision (a), or for the purpose of determining compliance with the Unclaimed Property Law (Title 10 (commencing with Section 1300) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure), as provided in subdivision (b).

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Income” means net income as reported on Forms 100, 100S, and 100W, ordinary income as reported on Form 565, total income as reported on Form 568, or total gross receipts as reported on Form 199.

(2) “Revenue range” is a range of income amounts determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) “Unclaimed property” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1300 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(4) “Unclaimed property report” means the report and remittance required to be filed pursuant to Sections 1530 and 1532 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 92, Sec. 1.   (AB 466)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19554.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19542, subject to the limitations of this section and federal law, the Franchise Tax Board may provide to the Controller return or return information, including identifying information and other information necessary for the Controller to make payments to “qualified recipients” pursuant to Section 8150, 8150.2, or 8161 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) (1) The information provided to the Controller under this section is subject to Section 19542.
